Hawaii statutes.
§587A-32 Permanent plan. (a) The
permanent plan shall:

(1) State whether the permanency goal for the child
will be achieved through adoption, legal guardianship, or permanent custody;

(2) Establish a reasonable period of time by which
the adoption or legal guardianship shall be finalized;

(3) Document:

(A) A compelling reason why legal
guardianship or permanent custody is in the child's best interests if adoption
is not the goal; or

(B) A compelling reason why permanent custody
is in the child's best interests if adoption or legal guardianship is not the
goal;

(4) Establish other related goals, including those
pertaining to the stability of the child's placement; education; health;
therapy; counseling; relationship with the child's birth family, including
visits, if any; cultural connections; and preparation for independent living;

(5) If a child has reached the age of fourteen,
describe the services needed to assist the child with the transition from
foster care to independent living; and

(6) Describe the methods for achieving the goals and
objectives set forth in paragraphs (4) and (5).

(b) A permanent plan prepared for a periodic
review hearing or a permanency hearing shall describe:

(1) Progress toward achieving the goal of the plan;

(2) Proposed revisions to the goal of the plan and
reasons for the revisions; and

(3) Proposed revisions to the methods for achieving
the goals of the plan and objectives and the reasons for the revisions. [L
2010, c 135, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 133, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next